Tennessee, session 114, SB1224.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-32-101(m)(1)(A), is amended by
deleting "fifteen (15) years" and substituting "ten (10) years".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1224
001054
- 1 -